Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
68-1909
Medical assistance program, defined.

Medical assistance
program means the medical assistance program established pursuant to the Medical
Assistance Act.

Laws 2011, LB600, § 9.

Medical Assistance Act, see section 68-901.